Washington statutes.
RCW 4.84.300

Attorneys' fees as costs in damage actions of ten thousand dollars or less—Application.

The provisions of RCW 4.84.250 through 4.84.290 shall apply regardless of whether the action is commenced in district court or superior court except as provided in RCW 4.84.280. This section shall not be construed as conferring jurisdiction on either court.

[ 1987 c 202 s 123; 1980 c 94 s 4; 1973 c 84 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Effective date—1980 c 94: See note following RCW 4.84.250.